Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; HELMETS TO HARDHATS.new text end new text begin $238,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $238,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of labor and industry for a grant to Building Strong Communities for the Minnesota Helmets to Hardhats program. These funds must be used to facilitate participation of National Guard, reserve, and active duty military members and veterans in apprenticeship programs registered with the Department of Labor and Industry and connect these members and veterans to career training and employment in the building and construction industries. Program recruitment, selection, employment, and training must not discriminate based on race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, physical or mental disability, receipt of public assistance, or age. new text end